Massachusetts, session 194th, HD6293.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
1  SECTION 1. Findings and Declarations. 
2  (a) Artificial intelligence is becoming ubiquitous across the Commonwealth. In 
3 particular, the systems are used to impact decisions around housing, employment, healthcare, 
4 education, social development and interactions, and access to public services. The outcomes and 
5 inferences, the process by which a deployed machine learning model or generative AI system 
6 produces outputs, are not transparent to the individuals and residents they affect. It is readily 
7 apparent these systems shape the livelihoods and socioeconomic development of Massachusetts 
8 residents often without their knowledge. 
9  (b) The invisible use of AI systems in consequential decisions around human life, 
10 development, and dignity is the primary risk to an individual's cognitive sovereignty and to 
11 democratic governance itself. These systems have the capability to assess residents without 
12 disclosure, modify an individual's or collective group's experience based on an assessment, and 
13 shape what information they receive, how options or decisions are framed, and what a person 

2 of 58 14 comes to believe is possible. This is drawn from the data collected about them through the 
15 interaction between human and AI systems and characteristics the system inferred from it; all 
16 invisibly and without the individual's knowledge. 
17  (c) Article 89 of the Amendments to the Massachusetts Constitution, specifically the 
18 Home Rule Amendment approved by voters in 1966, and Bloom v. Worcester, 363 Mass. 136 
19 (1973) give municipalities the autonomy to draft and enforce ordinances so as they do not 
20 conflict with State law and do not interfere with the aggregate intent of the legislature, 
21 specifically an intent that courts are permitted to infer even from statutes that do not reference or 
22 mention municipalities at all. 
23  (d) The General Court determines that municipalities possess the constitutional authority 
24 to require transparency around AI systems operating in their communities. This authority exists 
25 whether or not a municipality chooses to exercise it and shall not be taken away silently. Any 
26 restriction on that authority must be stated by the General Court, expressly in plain language, 
27 such that no court reads a statute that never mentions a municipality as taking that authority away 
28 and so that the customary and traditional liberties of the people in the conduct of their local 
29 government are not infringed by silence or invisibility. 
30  (e) The General Court further determines that when any physical AI infrastructure, such 
31 as a data center, operates in a community; the impacts that cross beyond the facility's site 
32 boundaries, including the water it consumes, the demands put on the electric grid, and the 
33 emissions of its backup generation are impacts on the community itself. A municipality shall 
34 have the authority to require the owner or operator of such a facility to make regular and 
35 transparent reports of these impacts. Their reporting must be drawn from readily available data, 

3 of 58 36 expressed in common, explainable units. These reports must be provided to the municipality and 
37 to the residents of the community. This finding does not limit the right of residents to 
38 transparency around the outputs and inferences of any AI system or machine learning algorithm 
39 that operates from such a facility when used in consequential decisions around their lives, as 
40 provided in these findings and this act. The authority vested in the municipality is in addition to, 
41 and does not diminish, any existing authority around land use, zoning, and public health. This 
42 authority shall not be taken away as provided in these findings. 
43  (f) The General Court further determines that when AI systems are deployed and used, 
44 the interactions generate data around the people and communities they operate in. This data is 
45 then collected and retained, and fed back into the training and improving of these models 
46 (creating a feedback loop where deployment creates new data and the data improves the model). 
47 This loop gives the data generated by residents and their communities real economic value to the 
48 owner or operator of said system. The residents of the communities, that generate this data have 
49 the right to know when their information goes back into this loop, whether it is retained, used to 
50 train or improve AI and machine learning systems, or is shared, such that the value taken from a 
51 community is visible to the community itself in accessible and common language. 
52  (g) The General Court further determines that when AI systems are offered to 
53 governments at nominal cost, through federal and state purchasing vehicles, these systems arrive 
54 in the schools, the police departments, sheriffs' offices, and the service offices of a community 
55 faster than a community can deliberate around them. The speed at which they are implemented 
56 reduces their ability to defend their own cognitive sovereignty and, in essence, is a choice made 
57 for them not by them. A municipality shall have the authority to make its own decisions around 
58 the adoption and operation of AI systems in its own operations and services, to evaluate and 

4 of 58 59 adopt them, to decline and discontinue them, and to set their terms of use. This authority belongs 
60 to the self government of the community itself. No State agency, executive order, regulation, or 
61 administrative action shall interfere with it. Any restriction on this authority must be stated by 
62 the General Court expressly and in plain language. 
63  (h) The General Court further determines that the same speed and the same nominal cost 
64 reach the Commonwealth itself as purchaser. When the state acquires an AI system outside the 
65 competitive evaluation, the public accountability, and the disclosure of conflicts of interest that 
66 the people require of all other public purchasing, the choice is again made for the residents and 
67 not by them. The purchasing of AI systems by the Commonwealth must be held to the standards 
68 the people have always required of the purchasing done in their name. A system demonstrated 
69 under the conditions of its maker's choosing has not been demonstrated under the conditions of 
70 the Commonwealth's use, and the difference between those two sets of conditions is borne by the 
71 resident. 
72  (i) The General Court further determines that the administration of the transparency 
73 rights, certifications, and community understanding established by this act must be entrusted to 
74 an entity captured neither by any single branch of government nor by industry, so that the trust 
75 the act is built to create is not undone by the body that administers it. 
76  SECTION 2. Purpose. 
77  The purpose of this Act is to: 
78  (a) establish that every resident of the Commonwealth has the right to know when an AI 
79 system is used in a consequential decision around their life, at the moment of interaction where 
80 the system meets the person and not merely at the moment the system was trained; 

5 of 58 81  (b) protect the authority of municipalities to require, if they choose, transparency around 
82 AI systems operating in their communities, an authority that shall not be diminished by this Act 
83 and shall not be taken away except as the General Court provides expressly and in plain 
84 language; 
85  (c) recognize that the impacts of physical AI infrastructure cross beyond the boundaries 
86 of the facility's site and into the community itself, and protect the authority of municipalities to 
87 require regular and transparent reporting of those impacts, drawn from readily available data and 
88 expressed in common, explainable terms and units; 
89  (d) ensure that residents know when the data generated by their interactions with an AI 
90 system is retained, used to train or improve the system, or shared; and that the value extracted 
91 from a community is made visible and transparent to the community itself, in accessible and 
92 common language; 
93  (e) ensure that when the Commonwealth purchases an AI system, the purchase is held to 
94 the same competitive evaluation, the same public accountability, and the same disclosure of 
95 conflicts of interest that the people require of all other public purchasing; and to provide that the 
96 Commonwealth, as purchaser, shall require of any vendor a plain and truthful accounting of 
97 whether the system can disclose its use, its outputs, and its inferences to the people it is used 
98 upon; that the Commonwealth shall have the right to audit the inferences of any such system 
99 across the linguistic, socioeconomic, and demographic subgroups of its residents; and that the 
100 Commonwealth shall choose the system that can be transparent and honest to the people it 
101 serves, so that what cannot be disclosed today for want of technological capability is disclosed 
102 tomorrow; 

6 of 58 103  (f) build a statewide understanding, grounded in the communities themselves, of how 
104 artificial intelligence is experienced by the residents it is used upon, across the cities and towns 
105 of the Commonwealth, recognizing that human understanding must be the cornerstone upon 
106 which any approach to AI is built; 
107  (g) establish the Massachusetts AI Trust Authority as an independent public entity, 
108 captured neither by any single branch of government nor by industry, to administer the voluntary 
109 AI Trust Certification, the Innovation Sandbox, the reciprocity frameworks, and the Community 
110 Advisory Board established by this Act, and to receive the accountings and conduct the audits 
111 provided for in this Act; 
112  (h) make the Commonwealth the place where trustworthy artificial intelligence is built 
113 and deployed, by rewarding transparency over invisibility, and by drawing responsible 
114 investment through incentive, collaboration, and reciprocity rather than mandate; 
115  (i) demonstrate that transparency at the moment the system meets the person is feasible to 
116 the measure of the technological capability these systems already possess, and that the duty to 
117 disclose shall grow as technological capability grows; achievable without the compelled 
118 disclosure of trade secrets, training data, or the proprietary internal architectures of any model; 
119 and that it protects the cognitive sovereignty of the person and, through it, the human condition 
120 itself. This Act offers that model to the governance of AI at the state and federal levels, to 
121 complement and to strengthen it; 
122  (j) extend transparency to transactions in which an AI system acts on behalf of a resident, 
123 so that the right to know does not diminish or fail as these systems evolve from tools, to agents, 
124 to collective swarms; and 

7 of 58 125  (k) ensure that no resident of the Commonwealth is left behind as artificial intelligence 
126 reshapes the institutions, services, opportunities, and personal growth of daily life. 
127  SECTION 3. The General Laws are hereby amended by inserting after chapter 93L the 
128 following chapter: 93M 
129  CHAPTER 93M. THE MASSACHUSETTS DIGITAL COMMONWEALTH 
130  Section 1. Definitions. 
131  As used in this chapter, the following words shall have the following meanings unless the 
132 context clearly requires otherwise: 
133  "Artificial intelligence system" or "AI system", any machine-based system that, for a 
134 given set of objectives, generates outputs such as predictions, recommendations, decisions, or 
135 content that can influence real or virtual environments, including but not limited to machine 
136 learning systems, large language models, automated decision-making systems, and AI agents as 
137 defined herein. 
138  "AI agent", an AI system configured to take autonomous actions on behalf of a resident, 
139 including but not limited to searching, evaluating, negotiating, selecting, transacting, or 
140 communicating, without requiring contemporaneous human confirmation for each action. An AI 
141 agent includes a system of multiple AI agents acting in coordination, in sequence, or in concert, 
142 whether alike or specialized, however composed and however distributed, and the obligations of 
143 this chapter shall apply to such a system as a whole. 
144  "Agent provider", the entity that makes an AI agent available to a resident and that the 
145 resident has authorized, directly or through use of the agent, to act on the resident's behalf. 

8 of 58 146  "Authority", the Massachusetts AI Trust Authority established under section 9. 
147  "Certified AI system", an AI system holding a valid AI Trust Certification issued by the 
148 Authority under this chapter. 
149  "Community Advisory Board" or "Board", the Community Advisory Board established 
150 under section 10. 
151  "Consequential decision", a decision, recommendation, or determination for which an AI 
152 system is a substantial factor and which has a material legal or similarly significant effect on the 
153 provision or denial to a resident of, or the cost or terms of: 
154  (1) employment or an employment opportunity; 
155  (2) housing; 
156  (3) credit or financial services; 
157  (4) insurance; 
158  (5) education enrollment or an educational opportunity; 
159  (6) healthcare services; 
160  (7) public benefits or essential government services; 
161  (8) legal services; or 
162  (9) engagement with the criminal justice system. 
163  A determination shall also constitute a consequential decision, regardless of whether it 
164 falls within the categories enumerated above, if the AI system engages in inference-time 

9 of 58 165 profiling of the resident in the course of generating its output; provided, however, that where 
166 such a determination does not have a material legal or similarly significant effect on the resident, 
167 the obligations arising under section 2 shall be limited to the matters described in section 2(a)(1), 
168 (2), (4), and (5), and may be satisfied by a clear and conspicuous disclosure presented within the 
169 interface through which the resident interacts with the AI system, applicable in standardized 
170 form to all interactions under the same deployment. 
171  The term "consequential decision" does not include determinations made by AI systems 
172 performing exclusively: (i) narrow procedural tasks; (ii) pattern detection or anomaly flagging 
173 where the output is reviewed by a human who has the authority and the practical opportunity to 
174 alter or override the outcome before it affects the resident; or (iii) only the following functions: 
175 anti-fraud detection not employing facial recognition, cybersecurity or anti-malware operations, 
176 spam filtering, spell-checking, grammar correction, calculation, routine data storage or retrieval, 
177 or language translation; provided, however, that any such system that engages in inference-time 
178 profiling of a resident shall remain subject to the transparency obligations of section 2 
179 notwithstanding this exclusion. 
180  The Authority may, by regulation, add categories of decisions to this definition based on 
181 findings reported by the Community Advisory Board under section 10(g)(4), provided that any 
182 such addition satisfies the material legal or similarly significant effect standard established by 
183 this section. The Authority may not, by regulation, remove any category enumerated in this 
184 section. 
185  "Covered facility", physical AI infrastructure with a design critical information 
186 technology load of not less than 5 megawatts, together with any colocated or contiguous physical 

10 of 58 187 AI infrastructure under common ownership or control the combined design critical information 
188 technology load of which is not less than 5 megawatts. 
189  "Delegated transaction", an action taken by an AI agent on behalf of a resident that 
190 commits the resident to a financial obligation, alters a contractual relationship, or affects access 
191 to a service, without contemporaneous human confirmation of that specific action. 
192  "Deployer", any person, entity, or government agency that deploys or uses an AI system 
193 within the commonwealth, or that deploys or uses an AI system, wherever operated, upon the 
194 residents of the commonwealth, whether as a developer, operator, or procuring entity. 
195  "Deployment objective", the objective or objectives established for an AI system in a 
196 given deployment, including any objective embodied in instructions, configurations, or 
197 parameters provided to the system at or before inference, whether established by the deployer, 
198 the vendor, or any other party. A deployment objective is stated as purpose and effect, in 
199 accessible and common language, and not as the verbatim content of any instruction, 
200 configuration, or parameter, and may be stated in a standardized form applicable to all 
201 interactions under the same deployment. The objective of a deployment directed at a resident is 
202 not a secret from that resident. 
203  "Determination", the output or conclusion an AI system produces at inference with 
204 respect to a resident, as distinct from the decision made concerning the resident. 
205  "Enterprise AI deployment", any procurement, contract, or agreement providing AI 
206 system access to more than 500 state employees or affecting services delivered to more than 
207 10,000 residents. 

11 of 58 208  "Facility impact report", a written report of the community impacts of a covered facility 
209 as provided in section 4, drawn from readily available data and expressed in common, 
210 explainable units. 
211  "Inference", the process by which a deployed AI system generates outputs, including 
212 predictions, recommendations, assessments, classifications, or content, in response to inputs, 
213 including inputs derived from or about a specific individual. Inference occurs at the point of 
214 impact: it is the moment at which a model's capabilities are applied to a real person or situation. 
215  "Inference audit", an examination, conducted by or at the direction of the Authority, of 
216 the outputs and inferences of an AI system as deployed, to identify disparities in the performance 
217 of those inferences across the linguistic, socioeconomic, and demographic subgroups of the 
218 residents of the commonwealth, and across the conditions under which the system is used, 
219 including variation in the phrasing, language, context, and channel of the interaction, and 
220 including the sustained interactions in which the system is used in practice. An audit conducted 
221 only under the conditions of the vendor's own evaluation is not an inference audit. 
222  "Inference-time profiling", the process by which an AI system, during the course of 
223 generating an output, assesses, classifies, or infers characteristics about an individual, including 
224 but not limited to emotional state, cognitive patterns, behavioral tendencies, demographic 
225 attributes, vulnerabilities, or susceptibility to influence, for the purpose of modifying the output 
226 delivered to that individual. 
227  "Massachusetts Municipal Association" or "MMA", the nonprofit membership 
228 association representing the cities and towns of the commonwealth, or its successor organization, 
229 acting in its capacity as a named consultation partner under this chapter. 

12 of 58 230  "Material financial relationship", any relationship in which an individual, or the 
231 individual's employer, parent company, or subsidiary, holds an ownership stake, investment 
232 interest, contractual partnership, or revenue-sharing arrangement with a vendor or prospective 
233 vendor, or has received compensation from such vendor within the preceding 36 months. 
234  "Material modification", with respect to a certified AI system, any change in its training 
235 data sources, its inference behavior on standardized benchmarks, its deployment scope, or its 
236 user population that the Authority by regulation determines to be material. The Authority shall 
237 establish the specific thresholds and criteria for material modification by rule and may update 
238 such criteria from time to time. 
239  "Physical AI infrastructure", a data center or other physical facility a principal function of 
240 which is to house computing, storage, or networking equipment used in the training of AI 
241 systems or in the operation of AI systems, including inference. 
242  "Readily available data", data that the owner or operator of a covered facility collects, 
243 generates, or receives in the ordinary course of designing, constructing, or operating the facility, 
244 or that the owner or operator reports to any federal or state agency, public utility, water or sewer 
245 authority, or independent system operator, together with data derivable from the foregoing 
246 without material additional instrumentation. 
247  "Substantial factor", with respect to the role of an AI system in a decision, 
248 recommendation, or determination, that the AI system both (i) assists in making the decision, 
249 recommendation, or determination, and (ii) is capable of altering the outcome. The mere 
250 involvement of an AI system in a peripheral, administrative, or ministerial function that is not 
251 capable of altering the outcome shall not constitute a substantial factor. 

13 of 58 252  "Transparency", the disclosure of sufficient information about an AI system's purpose, 
253 data inputs, logic, capabilities, limitations, and performance to enable meaningful awareness by 
254 affected residents and oversight by governing bodies. Disclosure that cannot be understood by 
255 the person it is owed to is not transparency. 
256  "Truthful accounting", a written disclosure, attested by an officer or principal of the 
257 vendor, stating in accessible and common language whether, and to what extent, an AI system 
258 can disclose its use, its outputs, and its inferences to the people it is used upon, including a 
259 statement of what the system cannot yet disclose and why. An accounting that omits a known 
260 limitation of the system is not truthful. 
261  "Trust Fund", the Massachusetts AI Trust Fund established under section 13. 
262  "Vendor", any person or entity that offers, sells, licenses, leases, or otherwise provides an 
263 AI system, or access to an AI system, to the commonwealth or to any deployer within the 
264 commonwealth, whether directly or through a reseller, integrator, or purchasing vehicle. 
265  Section 2. Right to Know. 
266  (a) Every resident of the commonwealth has the right to know when an AI system is used 
267 to make, inform, or materially influence a determination in a consequential decision affecting 
268 one's life. The right begins at inference. It does not begin at training, and no claim about training 
269 data, design, or authorship diminishes it. The right belongs to the resident; the duty to disclose 
270 and provide transparent understanding of the outcome extends to any affected individual. The 
271 right to know includes: 
272  (1) that an AI system was used in the decision; 

14 of 58 273  (2) the purpose and function of the system, and the deployment objective, stated in 
274 commonly understandable language; 
275  (3) the categories of data concerning the resident that the system processed at the time of 
276 inference; 
277  (4) whether the system assessed, profiled, or inferred characteristics of the individual in 
278 the course of generating its output; 
279  (5) whether information provided by the resident, or otherwise processed at inference, is 
280 retained, used to train or improve the AI system, or is shared with any third party; 
281  (6) how long information transmitted during inference is stored; 
282  (7) how often the system's performance is reviewed, and whether those reviews catch 
283 changes in how the system behaves after its deployment; 
284  (8) how the system behaves under different conditions, including the conditions under 
285 which its performance degrades; 
286  (9) how to contest or challenge the decision, with clear and understandable means to 
287 reach a human being with sufficient authority to review and audit the decision; and 
288  (10) the identity of the deployer, and whether any third party was used by the deployer in 
289 reaching the determination. 
290  (b) This section grants no authority to restrict, delay, condition, or prohibit the 
291 development, deployment, or use of any AI system, and none shall be inferred from it. It 
292 establishes a right to visibility, not a right to veto. 

15 of 58 293  (c) Disclosure must follow the point of inference. Where inference occurs as part of a 
294 human-AI system interaction, the deployer shall provide disclosure on how the outcome was 
295 determined, with any relevant context, in common language, at or before the moment of the 
296 determination. Where inference occurs without the person present, the disclosure must travel to 
297 them; the deployer shall provide direct notice to the affected individual at or before the moment 
298 of the decision, and where notice before is impracticable, within a reasonable time, and never 
299 more than 30 days after. A posting on a website or in terms of service may support the required 
300 disclosure but does not satisfy it. The disclosure must be explainable, and a disclosure the 
301 average individual cannot understand does not satisfy this requirement. A disclosure the person 
302 had no reasonable occasion to encounter was never made. 
303  (d) This section requires no disclosure of proprietary algorithms or architectures, training 
304 data, model weights, or trade secrets, or any other confidential intellectual property. 
305 Documentation or auditing of training data is not required. Transparency under this section is 
306 defined as disclosure to inform and provide explainable context, not disclosure with sufficient 
307 information to replicate or repeat. The obligations of this section attach solely to the application 
308 of the AI system, at inference, to the affected individual. 
309  (e) Delegated transactions. 
310  (1) When an AI agent undertakes a delegated transaction on behalf of a resident, the 
311 agent provider shall maintain a reviewable record of the transaction and shall make such record 
312 available to the resident in plain language within a reasonable time following the transaction. 
313 The record shall include: 
314  (A) a description of the action taken; 

16 of 58 315  (B) the alternatives considered by the agent, if any, and the basis for selecting the action 
316 taken; 
317  (C) any inference-time profiling performed on the resident or the resident's agent in the 
318 course of the transaction, to the extent known by the agent provider; 
319  (D) any financial or contractual consequences of the action for the resident; and 
320  (E) the identity of the agent provider and any third-party AI systems or platforms 
321 involved in the transaction, to the extent known by the agent provider. 
322  (2) The agent provider bears primary responsibility for the disclosure obligations of this 
323 subsection for the full chain of AI systems and third parties involved in executing a delegated 
324 transaction on behalf of a resident, regardless of the number or identity of intermediary systems. 
325  (3) Agent providers shall disclose to residents, prior to the resident's authorization of the 
326 agent, any preferred-vendor relationships, affiliate arrangements, or revenue-sharing incentives 
327 that may influence the agent's decisions. 
328  (4) The Authority may establish by regulation thresholds below which the record 
329 requirement of paragraph (1) does not apply. Such thresholds shall be designed to exclude 
330 routine, low-value, de minimis transactions while preserving the record requirement for 
331 transactions of material consequence. 
332  (f) Enforcement. 
333  (1) A knowing and willful failure to provide the disclosures required by this section in 
334 connection with a consequential decision or delegated transaction shall constitute an unfair or 
335 deceptive act or practice under chapter 93A of the General Laws. A resident who demonstrates 

17 of 58 336 that a consequential decision was made affecting them, or that a delegated transaction was 
337 undertaken on their behalf, without the disclosures required by this section may seek damages 
338 under the procedures and remedies established by said chapter 93A. The deprivation of the 
339 disclosures required by this section, including the loss of the opportunity to contest the 
340 determination and to reach human review as provided in subsection (a)(9), constitutes a distinct 
341 injury to the resident, separate from the violation itself. 
342  (2) A resident may seek injunctive or declaratory relief to compel the disclosures required 
343 by this section upon a showing that a deployer or agent provider has materially failed to provide 
344 such disclosures and that the resident is or will imminently be subject to a consequential decision 
345 or delegated transaction by the AI system. A court may grant preliminary injunctive relief under 
346 this paragraph upon a finding that the resident is likely to succeed on the merits and that the 
347 balance of equities favors disclosure. The court shall not require a showing of knowing and 
348 willful conduct as a condition of injunctive or declaratory relief under this paragraph. Relief 
349 under this paragraph shall be limited to requiring compliance with the disclosure obligations of 
350 this section and shall not extend to restricting the operation of any AI system. 
351  (3) The attorney general may bring an action for injunctive relief, declaratory relief, or 
352 civil penalties under chapter 93A, section 4, to enforce the disclosure requirements of this section 
353 against any deployer or agent provider. The attorney general may, prior to commencing an 
354 action, provide the deployer or agent provider with written notice of the alleged violation and a 
355 reasonable opportunity to achieve compliance with the disclosure requirements of this section. In 
356 determining whether to bring an action or to provide an opportunity to achieve compliance, the 
357 attorney general may consider the scope and frequency of non-compliance, the number of 
358 residents affected, and whether the deployer or agent provider has taken good-faith steps to 

18 of 58 359 comply or has been responsive to prior inquiries. Nothing in this paragraph limits the authority of 
360 the attorney general under chapter 93A or any other provision of law. 
361  (4) Nothing in this subsection creates a new cause of action for damages beyond those 
362 available under chapter 93A; it connects the transparency right established by this section to the 
363 existing enforcement framework of the commonwealth while ensuring that injunctive relief 
364 remains practically available to affected residents and that the attorney general may address 
365 systemic non-compliance. 
366  (5) With respect to a deployer that is a government agency not engaged in trade or 
367 commerce within the meaning of chapter 93A, the remedies available under this subsection shall 
368 be those provided in paragraph (2), together with any other remedy available under law; and the 
369 affected resident shall in addition have the right to review of the determination through the 
370 means required by subsection (a)(9). 
371  (g) Vendor support obligation. A vendor that provides an AI system used by a deployer in 
372 consequential decisions shall supply to the deployer, in standardized form, accurate information 
373 within the vendor's knowledge and control reasonably necessary for the deployer to satisfy the 
374 disclosure obligations of this section, and shall update such information upon any material 
375 modification to the system. A deployer's disclosure made in good-faith and reasonable reliance 
376 on information supplied under this subsection satisfies the deployer's obligation with respect to 
377 the matters so supplied, and responsibility for any inaccuracy in such information rests with the 
378 vendor. Nothing in this subsection requires the disclosure by a vendor of the materials described 
379 in subsection (d). 
380  Section 3. Municipal Authority. 

19 of 58 381  (a) Municipalities of the commonwealth shall possess inherent authority, consistent with 
382 the Home Rule Amendment and the general laws, to require transparency regarding AI systems 
383 deployed or operating within their jurisdictions that affect their residents. This authority includes 
384 the authority to: 
385  (1) require deployers to disclose, upon request, the purpose, general function, and 
386 categories of data inputs for AI systems used in consequential decisions affecting municipal 
387 residents; 
388  (2) require that residents affected by consequential AI decisions within the municipality 
389 have access to the information described in section 2; and 
390  (3) participate in voluntary municipal cooperation frameworks for shared transparency 
391 infrastructure. 
392  (b) Municipal authority under this section extends to transparency and visibility. Nothing 
393 in this section shall be construed to grant municipalities authority to prohibit, restrict, condition, 
394 license, or impose operational requirements upon the development, training, deployment, or use 
395 of AI systems. Municipalities may require that AI be visible. Municipalities may not require that 
396 AI be absent. 
397  (c) No state agency, executive order, regulation, or administrative action shall restrict, 
398 diminish, or preempt the authority of municipalities to require transparency regarding AI systems 
399 within their jurisdictions as affirmed by this section. 
400  (d) Rule of construction. No provision of the general laws, whether enacted before or 
401 after the effective date of this section, shall be construed to restrict, diminish, or preempt the 

20 of 58 402 authority of municipalities to require transparency regarding AI systems within their jurisdictions 
403 as affirmed by this section, unless such provision specifically and explicitly states that it is 
404 intended to restrict, diminish, or preempt municipal AI transparency authority established under 
405 this chapter. 
406  (e) Any ambiguity in a provision of the general laws regarding its effect on municipal AI 
407 transparency authority shall be resolved in favor of preserving such authority. 
408  (f) A municipality may seek injunctive relief to enforce the transparency requirements of 
409 this section through appropriate proceedings in the superior court. 
410  (g) Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit the authority of the General Court to 
411 establish minimum standards for AI transparency that municipalities may meet or exceed. 
412  (h) Municipal self-governance. Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to limit the 
413 authority of a municipality to decide whether, and on what terms, it procures, adopts, declines, 
414 discontinues, or uses AI systems in its own operations and in the services it delivers, and no state 
415 agency, executive order, regulation, or administrative action shall compel such adoption or 
416 interfere with such decisions. The limitations of subsection (b) concern the regulation by a 
417 municipality of persons other than the municipality itself and do not diminish the authority 
418 affirmed by this subsection. 
419  Section 4. Physical AI Infrastructure Transparency. 
420  (a) The impacts of a covered facility cross beyond the boundaries of the facility's site and 
421 into the community itself. A municipality in which a covered facility is located, in whole or in 
422 part, may require the owner or operator of the covered facility to prepare and provide facility 

21 of 58 423 impact reports as set forth in this section. A municipality that borders a municipality in which a 
424 covered facility is located, and that shares with the covered facility a water source, sewer system, 
425 or electric distribution infrastructure, may require that the facility impact reports prepared under 
426 this section be provided to it on the same terms. 
427  (b) A facility impact report shall state, for the reporting period, drawn from readily 
428 available data and expressed in common, explainable units: 
429  (1) the volume of water withdrawn by the facility and the volume of water consumed by 
430 the facility, stated separately, identified by source, together with the volume discharged to any 
431 sewer system; 
432  (2) the electricity consumed by the facility, its peak demand, and the share of its 
433 consumption served by on-site generation, identified by generation type; 
434  (3) the hours of operation of any backup or auxiliary generation, the fuel consumed by 
435 such generation, and the resulting emissions as calculated by the methods the owner or operator 
436 already employs in any report to a federal or state agency; 
437  (4) whether information generated by the interactions of residents of the commonwealth 
438 with AI systems operated from the facility is retained at the facility, used to train or improve AI 
439 systems, or shared, stated in accessible and common language, to the extent known by the owner 
440 or operator, so that the value taken from a community is visible to the community itself; and 
441  (5) any material change anticipated in the following reporting period in any matter 
442 reported under paragraphs (1) through (4). 

22 of 58 443  (c) A municipality may require facility impact reports not more frequently than quarterly. 
444 The owner or operator shall provide each report to the municipality and shall publish each report 
445 so that it is accessible to the residents of the community. A report drawn from data the owner or 
446 operator already collects or already reports satisfies this section; nothing in this section requires 
447 material additional instrumentation, and nothing in this section requires the disclosure of 
448 proprietary algorithms or architectures, training data, model weights, or trade secrets, or any 
449 other confidential intellectual property. 
450  (d) This section grants no authority to restrict, delay, condition, or prohibit the 
451 construction, operation, or use of any covered facility or any AI system, and none shall be 
452 inferred from it. It establishes a right to visibility, not a right to veto. The authority vested in the 
453 municipality by this section is in addition to, and does not diminish, any existing authority 
454 around land use, zoning, and public health. 
455  (e) No state agency, executive order, regulation, or administrative action shall restrict, 
456 diminish, or preempt the authority of municipalities under this section. No provision of the 
457 general laws, whether enacted before or after the effective date of this section, shall be construed 
458 to restrict, diminish, or preempt the authority of municipalities under this section unless such 
459 provision specifically and explicitly states that it is intended to do so, and any ambiguity shall be 
460 resolved in favor of preserving such authority. 
461  (f) Nothing in this section limits the right of residents to transparency around the outputs 
462 and inferences of any AI system that operates from a covered facility when used in consequential 
463 decisions around their lives, as provided in section 2. 

23 of 58 464  (g) A municipality may seek injunctive relief to enforce the requirements of this section 
465 through appropriate proceedings in the superior court. 
466  (h) A municipality in which a covered facility is proposed to be located, or is under 
467 construction, may require the person proposing or constructing the facility to provide a 
468 prospective facility impact report, stating the projected values of the matters described in 
469 subsection (b), drawn from the design specifications and interconnection filings for the facility 
470 and from readily available data, before the facility commences operation. A prospective report 
471 under this subsection is an instrument of visibility only; nothing in this subsection conditions any 
472 approval upon it, creates any approval process, or grants any authority to delay, restrict, or 
473 prohibit the construction or operation of the facility. 
474  Section 5. State Procurement of AI Systems. 
475  (a) This section shall apply to any enterprise AI deployment by the commonwealth or any 
476 state agency. 
477  (b) No enterprise AI deployment shall proceed without a documented competitive 
478 evaluation of not fewer than 3 qualified vendors, conducted through a publicly accessible 
479 procurement process. The procurement process shall include: 
480  (1) a public solicitation published on COMMBUYS or its successor system with not 
481 fewer than 45 days for vendor response; 
482  (2) published evaluation criteria, including technical capability, security certification, 
483 data protection, cost, and interoperability; 

24 of 58 484  (3) a written evaluation report comparing all responsive vendors against each published 
485 criterion; 
486  (4) publication of the evaluation report, redacted only as required by law to protect 
487 genuine trade secrets, within 30 days of contract award; and 
488  (5) submission by each responsive vendor of a truthful accounting of the AI system 
489 offered, including a statement of the conditions under which the vendor has evaluated the system 
490 and the conditions under which it has not. No vendor shall be deemed responsive without one. 
491 The truthful accounting of the vendor awarded the contract shall be published with the evaluation 
492 report under paragraph (4), and the capability of each offered system to disclose its use, its 
493 outputs, and its inferences to the people it is used upon shall be a published evaluation criterion 
494 under paragraph (2). 
495  (c) Any individual serving on an advisory body, task force, evaluation committee, or 
496 other entity that recommends, evaluates, or influences the selection of an AI vendor for state 
497 procurement shall file a public disclosure identifying: 
498  (1) any material financial relationship between the individual, or the individual's 
499 employer, and any prospective vendor; 
500  (2) any campaign contributions made by the individual to any elected official with 
501 authority over the procurement within the preceding 48 months; and 
502  (3) any board membership, advisory role, or consulting arrangement with any prospective 
503 vendor or the vendor's investors, partners, or parent company. 

25 of 58 504  (d) Disclosures required under subsection (c) shall be filed with the office of the inspector 
505 general and made publicly available on the commonwealth's procurement transparency portal 
506 within 14 days of the individual's appointment or, if later, within 14 days of the commencement 
507 of any procurement process. 
508  (e) An individual with a material financial relationship to a prospective vendor shall 
509 recuse themselves from any evaluation, recommendation, or vote pertaining to that vendor. 
510 Failure to disclose or recuse shall constitute a violation of chapter 268A and shall be referred to 
511 the state ethics commission. 
512  (f) No enterprise AI deployment shall be implemented without a consultation period of 
513 not fewer than 60 days during which affected public employees and their designated 
514 representatives may review the proposed deployment, submit comments, and receive written 
515 responses to substantive concerns. Where a collective bargaining agreement covers affected 
516 employees, the deployment shall be subject to the applicable provisions of such agreement 
517 regarding the introduction of new technology. 
518  (g) The procuring agency shall publish a workforce impact assessment identifying 
519 anticipated effects on job functions, required training, data access, and working conditions. 
520  (h) No enterprise AI deployment contract shall exceed a term of 3 years without renewal. 
521 Renewal shall require a new competitive evaluation under the standards of this section. 
522  (i) Every enterprise AI deployment shall include a quarterly performance review, the 
523 results of which shall be published and made available to the General Court, affected workers, 
524 and the public. Quarterly reviews shall address system performance, accuracy, observed drift as 
525 measured against the conditions of the evaluation conducted under subsection (b), fine-tuning or 

26 of 58 526 other material modifications since the prior review, and any issues identified by affected workers 
527 or residents. 
528  (j) The General Court shall receive notice of any proposed enterprise AI deployment not 
529 fewer than 60 days prior to contract execution, including the proposed vendor, contract value, 
530 scope of deployment, and a summary of the competitive evaluation. 
531  (k) The state auditor shall have authority to audit any enterprise AI deployment for 
532 compliance with the procurement standards established by this section. The inspector general 
533 shall have authority to investigate complaints regarding conflicts of interest, procurement 
534 irregularities, or violations of this section. 
535  (l) Every enterprise AI deployment contract shall provide that the Authority may conduct, 
536 or direct the conduct of, inference audits of the deployed AI system. The results of each 
537 inference audit shall be published with the quarterly performance review under subsection (i), 
538 redacted only as required by law, and shall be provided to the Community Advisory Board. 
539  (m) This section shall apply to enterprise AI deployment contracts entered into or 
540 renewed on or after the effective date of this act. Nothing in this section shall be construed to 
541 invalidate or require renegotiation of contracts entered into prior to said effective date. 
542  (n) Exceptions. The requirements of subsections (b), (f), and (j) may be modified or 
543 waived only upon written findings by the secretary of administration and finance, published 
544 within 14 days and provided to the inspector general and the General Court, that: (1) fewer than 
545 3 qualified vendors exist for the system sought, in which case the competitive evaluation shall 
546 include all qualified vendors; (2) an emergency affecting cybersecurity, public health, or public 
547 safety requires deployment before the periods prescribed can run, in which case any resulting 

27 of 58 548 contract shall not exceed 12 months and any renewal shall comply with this section in full; (3) 
549 the system is required by federal law or as a condition of federal funds; or (4) the deployment is 
550 a pilot of not more than 6 months' duration and $250,000 in value, not renewable except through 
551 full compliance with this section. Every waiver under this subsection shall be time-limited, shall 
552 be subject to audit under subsection (k), and shall not modify or waive the disclosure and 
553 publication requirements of this section. 
554  Section 6. Community AI Understanding Program. 
555  (a) The General Court finds that Massachusetts shall lead in the human-centered 
556 implementation of artificial intelligence, and that no statewide approach to AI can succeed 
557 without a grounded understanding of how AI is encountered, understood, and experienced by 
558 residents across the commonwealth's diverse communities. 
559  (b) There is hereby established the Community AI Understanding Program, administered 
560 by the Authority in partnership with the Massachusetts Municipal Association as provided under 
561 section 11, through which municipalities may conduct annual assessments of how artificial 
562 intelligence affects their residents, institutions, and local economies. Participation in the program 
563 shall be voluntary. 
564  (c) An annual Community AI Assessment may be conducted through any mechanism the 
565 municipality deems appropriate, including but not limited to a town meeting agenda item, a 
566 public forum, a resident survey, a report prepared by municipal staff or a designated appointee, 
567 or any combination thereof. Municipalities are encouraged to select assessment formats that 
568 reach residents whose civic participation patterns may not run through traditional municipal 
569 government channels. The assessment should address: 

28 of 58 570  (1) how AI systems are currently encountered and experienced by residents of the 
571 municipality; 
572  (2) the opportunities, concerns, knowledge gaps, and support needs of the community 
573 with respect to artificial intelligence; 
574  (3) any consequential decisions affecting residents that are known to involve AI systems; 
575  (4) the state of community understanding and readiness with respect to artificial 
576 intelligence; and 
577  (5) the extent to which data generated by the interactions of residents with AI systems is 
578 known to be retained, used to train or improve such systems, or shared, and any facility impact 
579 reports provided under section 4 to the municipality during the assessment period. 
580  (d) Municipalities are encouraged to submit completed assessments to the Community 
581 Advisory Board established in section 10 for inclusion in the statewide synthesis. 
582  (e) Nothing in this section creates any regulatory authority, permitting requirement, 
583 review process, or mechanism by which a municipality may delay, condition, or restrict the 
584 deployment or use of any AI system. The Community AI Understanding Program is an 
585 instrument of awareness and understanding, not governance or enforcement. 
586  (f) The Authority shall affirmatively recruit participation from geographically and 
587 demographically diverse municipalities, with specific attention to Gateway Cities, rural 
588 communities, and municipalities with significant populations for whom English is not the 
589 primary language at home. The Authority shall report annually on the geographic and 

29 of 58 590 demographic diversity of participating municipalities and shall take reasonable steps to address 
591 gaps in representation. 
592  (g) The General Court shall appropriate such sums as may be necessary to support 
593 municipalities in conducting annual assessments, with priority given to municipalities with 
594 populations under 25,000 and municipalities with limited existing technical capacity. The 
595 Authority shall administer grants to participating municipalities from the Trust Fund established 
596 under section 13. 
597  Section 7. AI Trust Certification, Innovation Sandbox, and Reciprocity. 
598  (a) The General Court finds that transparency and innovation are mutually reinforcing. 
599 Jurisdictions that establish clear, predictable standards for AI transparency create conditions of 
600 trust that attract responsible investment, expand market access, and accelerate the development 
601 and deployment of trustworthy AI systems. The purpose of this section is to position the 
602 Commonwealth of Massachusetts as the premier jurisdiction for the development and 
603 deployment of transparent, trustworthy AI. The General Court intends that the transparency 
604 standards established by this chapter serve as a model for AI governance at the state and federal 
605 level and shall continue in full force unless expressly preempted by federal law. 
606  (b) AI Trust Certification. 
607  (1) There is hereby established the Massachusetts AI Trust Certification, a voluntary 
608 program administered by the Authority under which AI developers and deployers may earn a 
609 state-backed certification demonstrating compliance with transparency and accountability 
610 standards. 

30 of 58 611  (2) The AI Trust Certification program shall: 
612  (A) establish tiered certification levels reflecting the degree and scope of transparency 
613 and accountability demonstrated by the applicant, including at minimum a foundational tier 
614 based on self-attestation to recognized standards, an intermediate tier based on third-party 
615 verification, and an advanced tier based on internationally recognized management-system 
616 certification; 
617  (B) where appropriate, reference and incorporate existing recognized frameworks, 
618 including but not limited to the National Institute of Standards and Technology AI Risk 
619 Management Framework, ISO/IEC 42001, and comparable international standards, to promote 
620 interoperability; 
621  (C) publish certification criteria, application procedures, and evaluation standards in 
622 advance and make them freely available to prospective applicants; 
623  (D) conduct evaluations through a transparent review process, with results published 
624 within 60 days of application; 
625  (E) issue certifications valid for a period of 2 years, renewable through demonstrated 
626 continued compliance; 
627  (F) specify the scope of each certification, including the specific AI systems and 
628 deployment contexts covered, and require certified entities to use the certification mark only in 
629 connection with that specified scope; and 

31 of 58 630  (G) maintain a public registry of all certified entities, including the tier of certification, 
631 the scope of certification, the date of issuance and expiration, and the status of any open formal 
632 inquiries or revocation proceedings under section 10. 
633  (3) A certified entity shall notify the Authority within 30 days of any material 
634 modification to a certified AI system. The Authority shall by regulation establish the criteria for 
635 material modification, procedures for review, and timelines for re-evaluation, which shall be 
636 proportionate to the risk and scope of the modification. 
637  (c) Entities holding a current Massachusetts AI Trust Certification shall be eligible for: 
638  (1) preferred consideration in state and municipal AI procurement processes, provided 
639 such preference does not override the competitive evaluation requirements of section 5 of this 
640 chapter; 
641  (2) eligibility for innovation grants funded through appropriations designated for the 
642 purposes of this section or through the Trust Fund; 
643  (3) expedited transparency compliance within participating municipalities, under which a 
644 current certification may be presented as presumptive evidence of compliance with municipal 
645 transparency requirements, to the extent such requirements fall within the scope of the 
646 certification; and 
647  (4) use of the Massachusetts AI Trust Certification mark in commercial materials, subject 
648 to terms established by the Authority, provided that the mark may be used only in connection 
649 with the specific AI systems and deployment contexts within the scope of the certification, and 
650 any use of the mark shall disclose the tier and scope. 

32 of 58 651  (d) Innovation Sandbox. 
652  (1) There is hereby established an Innovation Sandbox through which entities may deploy 
653 experimental AI systems in participating municipalities under enhanced transparency conditions. 
654 The Innovation Sandbox shall: 
655  (A) permit accelerated deployment timelines for AI systems that are not yet eligible for 
656 full AI Trust Certification, provided the deploying entity agrees to enhanced transparency and 
657 community feedback mechanisms exceeding the standard requirements of this chapter; 
658  (B) limit experimental deployments to a period of not more than 12 months, renewable 
659 once upon demonstration of satisfactory performance and community benefit, and subject to 
660 review by the Community Advisory Board; 
661  (C) require the informed consent of the participating municipality's governing body; 
662  (D) require the deploying entity to publish quarterly public reports detailing system 
663 performance, identified issues, community feedback received, and corrective actions taken; 
664  (E) provide a structured pathway from sandbox participation to full AI Trust 
665 Certification; and 
666  (F) require public disclosure of the reason for any exit from the sandbox without 
667 successful transition to full certification. 
668  (2) The Authority shall by regulation establish application procedures, participation 
669 criteria, data-usage limits, required consumer disclosures, reporting requirements, and fees for 
670 the Innovation Sandbox. Such regulations shall include substantive review of sandbox 

33 of 58 671 applications by the Community Advisory Board and a requirement that the Authority respond in 
672 writing to Board recommendations regarding sandbox admissions and exits. 
673  (e) Reciprocity. 
674  (1) The Authority shall actively seek reciprocity agreements with other states, regional 
675 compacts, federal agencies, and international jurisdictions that maintain AI transparency 
676 frameworks compatible with the standards established under this chapter. Reciprocity 
677 agreements may provide for: 
678  (A) mutual recognition of AI trust certifications or equivalent credentials; 
679  (B) shared technical standards for transparency and interoperability; 
680  (C) coordinated enforcement of AI transparency requirements; and 
681  (D) coordinated approaches to emerging AI transparency challenges. 
682  (2) Reciprocity agreements shall be approved by the Authority's governing board 
683 following equivalency analysis and consultation with the Community Advisory Board. No 
684 mutual recognition shall be extended to a partner jurisdiction unless the Authority finds that the 
685 partner jurisdiction's standards meet the floor established by this chapter. 
686  (3) An entity that has been denied Massachusetts certification on substantive grounds 
687 shall be ineligible for reciprocity-based operation in the commonwealth for a period to be 
688 established by the Authority by regulation. 
689  (f) Annual Innovation and Trust Report. The Authority shall publish an annual 
690 Innovation and Trust Report assessing the effectiveness of the AI Trust Certification, Innovation 

34 of 58 691 Sandbox, and reciprocity programs, including: the number of certifications issued, renewed, 
692 suspended, and revoked; the scope and tier distribution of certifications; the economic impact of 
693 certified entities within the commonwealth; the outcomes of sandbox deployments; the status of 
694 reciprocity agreements; the status of AI transparency legislation in other states and at the federal 
695 level; and recommendations for maintaining the commonwealth's leadership position. The report 
696 shall be submitted to the General Court, the Community Advisory Board, and the Massachusetts 
697 Municipal Association, and shall be made publicly available. 
698  Section 8. Legislative Oversight. 
699  (a) The Joint Committee on Advanced Information Technology, the Internet and 
700 Cybersecurity, or such successor committee as the General Court may designate, shall exercise 
701 oversight of this chapter, including: 
702  (1) receiving and reviewing the annual reports of the Authority, the Community Advisory 
703 Board, and the Massachusetts Municipal Association regarding its activities under section 11; 
704  (2) reviewing compliance with the procurement standards established in section 5; 
705  (3) monitoring any state or federal legislative proposals that would affect municipal AI 
706 transparency authority; 
707  (4) recommending amendments as necessary to address emerging technologies, 
708 governance challenges, or threats to transparency rights; and 
709  (5) receiving referrals from the Community Advisory Board under section 10(k) 
710 regarding disputes between the Board and the Authority or concerns regarding the systematic 
711 performance of the Authority. 

35 of 58 712  (b) The Joint Committee shall hold at least 1 public hearing annually to receive testimony 
713 from the Authority, the Community Advisory Board, the Massachusetts Municipal Association, 
714 municipalities, affected workers, and members of the public regarding the implementation and 
715 effectiveness of this chapter. 
716  (c) Upon receipt of a referral from the Community Advisory Board under section 10(k), 
717 the Joint Committee shall hold a public hearing within 90 days at which the Executive Director 
718 of the Authority and the Chair of the Community Advisory Board shall appear and respond. 
719  Section 9. Massachusetts AI Trust Authority. 
720  (a) Establishment. There shall be established within the executive office for 
721 administration and finance, but not under its control, a state agency known as the Massachusetts 
722 AI Trust Authority. The Authority shall be an independent public entity not subject to the 
723 supervision and control of any other executive office, department, commission, board, bureau, 
724 agency or political subdivision of the commonwealth, and shall have all of the powers and duties 
725 set forth in this chapter. 
726  (b) Governing board. 
727  (1) The Authority shall be governed by a board of 13 members, of whom 11 shall be 
728 voting members, consisting of: 
729  (A) the secretary of economic development or designee, ex officio, non-voting; 
730  (B) 3 members appointed by the governor, of whom one shall serve as chairperson; 
731  (C) 2 members appointed by the attorney general; 

36 of 58 732  (D) 2 members appointed by the state auditor; 
733  (E) 1 member appointed by the president of the senate; 
734  (F) 1 member appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives; 
735  (G) 2 members selected by the Community Advisory Board from among its seated 
736 members, each of whom shall serve on the governing board for the duration of their service on 
737 the Community Advisory Board and shall not vote on any revocation recommendation in which 
738 they participated as a member of the Community Advisory Board; and 
739  (H) 1 member designated by the Massachusetts Municipal Association as provided in 
740 section 11, non-voting. 
741  (2) Appointed members shall serve staggered 5-year terms. Initial appointments shall be 
742 designated by the appointing authorities to create a staggered schedule such that no more than 3 
743 appointed seats are subject to replacement in any single year. 
744  (3) Members shall include, collectively, persons with demonstrated expertise in machine 
745 learning or artificial intelligence engineering, information security, civil rights and consumer 
746 protection, organized labor, municipal governance, academic AI research, and industry 
747 deployment of AI systems. At least one appointed member shall be a resident of a Gateway City. 
748  (4) No appointed member shall hold any other full- or part-time employment in the 
749 executive branch of the commonwealth during service. All appointed members shall be deemed 
750 special state employees for purposes of chapter 268A. During service and for 1 year following 
751 service, no appointed member shall be employed by, consult for, or hold equity in any entity 
752 certified by the Authority, applying for certification, or participating in the Innovation Sandbox. 

37 of 58 753  (5) No individual with a material financial relationship to any AI vendor holding or 
754 seeking a Massachusetts AI Trust Certification or Innovation Sandbox admission shall be 
755 eligible for appointment to the governing board. 
756  (6) A majority of seated voting members shall constitute a quorum. Adoption or 
757 amendment of certification criteria, sandbox standards, or reciprocity agreements, and action on 
758 revocation recommendations from the Community Advisory Board, shall require the affirmative 
759 vote of not fewer than 8 voting members. 
760  (c) Powers and duties. The Authority shall have the power to: 
761  (1) adopt regulations governing voluntary AI Trust Certification, the Innovation Sandbox, 
762 reciprocity agreements, material-modification review, delegated-transaction thresholds, and other 
763 matters within its jurisdiction; 
764  (2) establish by rule application procedures, participation criteria, data-usage limits, 
765 required consumer disclosures, reporting requirements, and fees for all programs administered by 
766 the Authority; 
767  (3) conduct investigations, inference audits, and public hearings, including the inference 
768 audits provided for in section 5(l); 
769  (4) enter into reciprocity and mutual-recognition agreements with other states, federal 
770 agencies, and international bodies; 
771  (5) designate accredited third-party assessors to conduct evaluations on behalf of the 
772 Authority, subject to standards established by regulation; 
773  (6) accept appropriations, federal funds, grants, and private gifts; 

38 of 58 774  (7) make contracts and execute instruments necessary to its functions, including contracts 
775 with the Massachusetts Municipal Association, the Collins Center for Public Management at the 
776 University of Massachusetts Boston, and other qualified entities for specified community 
777 engagement, municipal coordination, and technical assistance functions; 
778  (8) employ staff outside the civil service system and set compensation appropriate to 
779 specialized technical talent; and 
780  (9) publish information, reports, and advisory opinions, without the approval of any other 
781 officer or employee of any executive agency with respect to the substance of any report or 
782 publication. 
783  (d) Executive Director. The governing board shall appoint an Executive Director by 
784 majority vote. The Executive Director shall serve at the pleasure of the board and shall have 
785 responsibility for the day-to-day operations of the Authority, including the deployment of staff 
786 resources consistent with priorities established by the governing board and, with respect to 
787 Community Advisory Board operations, by the Community Advisory Board. 
788  (e) Post-employment restrictions. 
789  (1) No staff member of the Authority involved in certification decisions, sandbox 
790 admissions, or investigations may, for a period of 1 year following separation from the 
791 Authority, be employed by, consult for, or hold equity in any entity with respect to which the 
792 staff member made certification decisions, sandbox decisions, or investigation-related decisions 
793 within the preceding 24 months. 

39 of 58 794  (2) The Authority shall by regulation establish procedures for monitoring and enforcing 
795 the post-employment restrictions of this subsection. 
796  (f) Trade-secret confidentiality. Documentary materials or data consisting of trade secrets 
797 or confidential technical, commercial, or financial information of entities participating in the 
798 Authority's voluntary certification program, Innovation Sandbox, or reciprocity program shall 
799 not be public records within the meaning of section 10 of chapter 66, or clause Twenty-sixth of 
800 section 7 of chapter 4. Nothing in this subsection limits the obligation of the Authority to 
801 maintain a public registry of certified entities and certification status as required by section 
802 7(b)(2)(G). 
803  (g) Conflict of interest. Members of the governing board and staff of the Authority are 
804 subject to chapter 268A. The Authority shall by regulation establish additional ethics standards 
805 appropriate to the specialized nature of its work. 
806  Section 10. Community Advisory Board. 
807  (a) Establishment and purpose. There is hereby established within the Authority a 
808 Community Advisory Board to synthesize community-level understanding of artificial 
809 intelligence into a statewide picture that informs policy, innovation, and democratic 
810 participation, and to exercise the oversight, petition, investigatory, and revocation-
811 recommendation authorities set forth in this section. The Community Advisory Board shall be a 
812 statutorily independent body within the Authority, funded through the Trust Fund, and not 
813 subject to direction by the Executive Director of the Authority with respect to the exercise of its 
814 authorities under this section. 

40 of 58 815  (b) Composition. The Community Advisory Board shall consist of 11 voting members, 
816 together with 1 non-voting member designated by the Massachusetts Municipal Association as 
817 provided in section 11. The voting members shall be selected as follows: 
818  (1) 7 members nominated by the governing bodies of municipalities that have 
819 participated in the Community AI Understanding Program and selected through the public 
820 application and review process described in subsection (e); 
821  (2) 1 member representing organized labor, nominated by the Massachusetts AFL-CIO 
822 and confirmed through the public review process described in subsection (e); 
823  (3) 1 member representing civil liberties and digital rights organizations, nominated on a 
824 rotating basis among organizations designated by the Authority in consultation with the 
825 Massachusetts Municipal Association for this purpose, with no single organization holding the 
826 nomination right for more than 1 consecutive term, and confirmed through the public review 
827 process described in subsection (e); and 
828  (4) 2 at-large members selected through open public application and review by the seated 
829 members of the Community Advisory Board, with preference for applicants demonstrating 
830 expertise in data governance, community organizing, municipal administration, or the effects of 
831 automated systems on underserved populations. 
832  (c) Diversity and expertise requirements. 
833  (1) The municipal seats under subsection (b)(1) shall not be more than 60 percent drawn 
834 from any single region of the commonwealth or from any single category of municipality defined 

41 of 58 835 by size or demographic composition. The Authority shall maintain standards to ensure 
836 geographic and demographic diversity among municipal seats. 
837  (2) The Community Advisory Board shall include, collectively, not fewer than 2 
838 members with demonstrated technical expertise in artificial intelligence, machine learning, or 
839 algorithmic systems, of whom not more than 1 shall be employed by a for-profit entity in the AI 
840 industry and at least 1 shall hold an academic or independent position. This requirement may be 
841 satisfied through the at-large seats, the municipal seats, or any combination thereof. 
842  (d) Terms of service and leadership. 
843  (1) Each member shall serve a term of 3 years. 
844  (2) No member shall serve more than 2 consecutive terms. A member who has served 2 
845 consecutive terms shall be ineligible for reappointment until the expiration of 1 full term 
846 following the conclusion of their service. 
847  (3) Terms shall be staggered so that no more than 4 seats are subject to selection in any 
848 single year. For initial appointments, the selecting bodies shall designate 3 members for initial 
849 terms of 3 years, 4 members for initial terms of 2 years, and 4 members for initial terms of 1 
850 year. 
851  (4) A vacancy occurring before the expiration of a term shall be filled through the same 
852 public application and selection process for the remainder of the unexpired term. Service to fill a 
853 vacancy of fewer than 18 months shall not count toward the 2-term limit. 
854  (5) The Board shall annually elect from among its seated members a Chair and Vice-
855 Chair, each to serve 1-year renewable terms. The Chair shall not be in their final year of service. 

42 of 58 856 The Vice-Chair shall be at a different point in the term cycle than the Chair to ensure leadership 
857 continuity across turnover. 
858  (6) A member may be removed for cause, including violation of confidentiality 
859 obligations, failure to disclose conflicts of interest, abuse of investigatory authority, or conduct 
860 incompatible with Board service, upon a two-thirds vote of the seated Board with cause 
861 documented in the public record. Removal is subject to appeal to the Superior Court. 
862  (e) Public application and selection process. 
863  (1) All nominations and applications for the Community Advisory Board shall be 
864 submitted through a public application process administered by the Authority in partnership with 
865 the Massachusetts Municipal Association. 
866  (2) Applications shall be publicly available for review for a period of not fewer than 30 
867 days prior to selection. 
868  (3) Selection criteria shall be published in advance, including but not limited to: 
869 demonstrated commitment to community engagement, relevant expertise or lived experience, 
870 geographic and demographic diversity, and absence of material financial relationships with AI 
871 vendors holding or seeking state or municipal AI contracts or certifications. 
872  (4) The Authority shall publish the names and qualifications of all applicants, a written 
873 summary of the review process, and the basis for each selection decision within 14 days of final 
874 selection; provided that home addresses, personal contact information, and other personal 
875 identifying information of applicants shall be redacted from publication. 
876  (f) Conflict of interest. 

43 of 58 877  (1) No individual with a material financial relationship to any AI vendor holding or 
878 seeking a Massachusetts AI Trust Certification or a state or municipal AI contract shall be 
879 eligible to serve on the Community Advisory Board; provided, however, that for purposes of 
880 eligibility for the seat described in subsection (c)(2), employment by a for-profit entity in the AI 
881 industry shall not, standing alone, constitute a material financial relationship unless the employer 
882 holds or is seeking a Massachusetts AI Trust Certification, Innovation Sandbox admission, or a 
883 state or municipal AI contract. 
884  (2) An individual with pending litigation against, or pending employment negotiation 
885 with, any such entity shall disclose that fact upon application and upon its arising, and shall not 
886 participate in any Board action concerning that entity during its pendency. 
887  (3) No individual who has made public statements advocating the shutdown, prohibition, 
888 or regulatory sanction of a specific identified entity within the preceding 24 months shall 
889 participate in any Board action concerning that entity, and shall disclose such statements upon 
890 seating. 
891  (4) A member nominated by a municipality that has received material funding from a 
892 certified entity, a sandbox participant, or an applicant for certification or sandbox admission 
893 within the preceding 36 months shall disclose that relationship publicly, and shall not participate 
894 in any Board action concerning the funding entity during the pendency of the relationship and for 
895 24 months thereafter. 
896  (5) Members shall annually file public disclosures identifying any relationships that could 
897 reasonably give rise to a conflict of interest under this subsection. 
898  (g) Core duties and authorities. The Community Advisory Board shall: 

44 of 58 899  (1) synthesize the findings of municipal Community AI Assessments into a statewide 
900 understanding of how artificial intelligence is experienced across the diverse communities of the 
901 commonwealth, identifying both the common values and the distinct local conditions that must 
902 inform state policy; 
903  (2) publish an annual report on the state of human understanding and readiness with 
904 respect to artificial intelligence across the commonwealth, including an independent assessment 
905 of the Authority's performance and whether certification and sandbox programs are reaching the 
906 communities the Board represents; 
907  (3) develop and publish recommended standards and plain-language guides to assist 
908 residents in understanding and exercising the rights established by section 2, including guides 
909 translated into the principal languages spoken across the commonwealth; 
910  (4) recommend to the Authority, on a rolling basis, proposed additions to the categories 
911 of consequential decision under section 1 that the Authority may adopt by regulation consistent 
912 with the standard established by that section, and recommend to the Joint Committee on 
913 Advanced Information Technology, the Internet and Cybersecurity proposed amendments to this 
914 chapter to address AI applications that materially affect residents but fall outside the scope of 
915 existing categories or the Authority's regulatory authority; and 
916  (5) advise the General Court, the governor, the Authority, and the Massachusetts 
917 Municipal Association on matters affecting communities with respect to artificial intelligence. 
918  (h) Investigatory authority. 

45 of 58 919  (1) The Community Advisory Board may initiate formal inquiries into whether certified 
920 entities, sandbox participants, or applicants are complying with their certification or sandbox 
921 terms, with the transparency obligations of section 2, or with the disclosure obligations of section 
922 5, upon substantiated complaint from an affected resident, a municipality, a public employee, or 
923 a designated representative. 
924  (2) A formal inquiry shall be opened only by the affirmative vote of not fewer than two-
925 thirds of the seated voting members, and in no event fewer than 6, with the vote and rationale 
926 documented in the public record. An inquiry shall not be initiated or pursued at the direction of 
927 any individual member without such Board action. 
928  (3) In the course of a formal inquiry, the Board may require the entity under inquiry to 
929 provide information relevant to the inquiry. The Board may seek enforcement of such 
930 requirements through subpoena issued in accordance with procedural rules governing the Board's 
931 own proceedings, which the Board shall adopt and publish and which shall provide, at minimum, 
932 standards of relevance and proportionality of scope, the preservation of applicable privileges, 
933 protection of trade secrets and confidential information consistent with section 9(f), reasonable 
934 methods of service, an opportunity to object, and modification or quashal by the Superior Court. 
935 A subpoena under this paragraph shall be enforceable through proceedings in the Superior Court. 
936  (4) A formal inquiry shall conclude within 18 months of initiation unless extended by the 
937 affirmative vote of not fewer than two-thirds of the seated voting members, and in no event 
938 fewer than 6, with published reasons. The Board shall publish findings at the conclusion of each 
939 inquiry, including findings of no violation where applicable. 

46 of 58 940  (5) Upon finding substantial evidence of non-compliance, the Board may refer the matter 
941 to the attorney general, the inspector general, the state ethics commission, or the governing board 
942 of the Authority for appropriate action. 
943  (6) Certified entities, sandbox participants, and applicants shall not be required to respond 
944 to informal inquiries by individual Board members. Only formally opened inquiries pursuant to 
945 paragraph (2) carry any obligation to respond. 
946  (7) The Board may prohibit, by rule, any funding, coordination, or organization by 
947 certified entities, sandbox participants, or applicants of community feedback submitted to the 
948 Board. Undisclosed activity of this nature shall constitute grounds for revocation 
949 recommendation. 
950  (i) Petition authority. 
951  (1) The Community Advisory Board may formally petition the governing board of the 
952 Authority to adopt, amend, or rescind any regulation, certification criterion, sandbox standard, or 
953 reciprocity agreement. 
954  (2) The governing board of the Authority shall respond in writing to any such petition 
955 within 60 days, addressing the substantive concerns raised and stating the basis for its action or 
956 inaction. 
957  (3) Prior to adopting or amending certification criteria, sandbox admission standards, or 
958 reciprocity agreements, the governing board of the Authority shall submit the proposed action to 
959 the Community Advisory Board for review and comment over a period of not fewer than 60 days 
960 and shall publish its written response to substantive comments alongside any final adoption. 

47 of 58 961  (4) If the governing board of the Authority fails to respond to a petition within the 
962 required time, or if its response does not address the substantive concerns raised in the petition, 
963 the Community Advisory Board may seek declaratory judgment in the Superior Court regarding 
964 the Authority's compliance with this subsection. 
965  (j) Revocation recommendation authority. 
966  (1) The Community Advisory Board may formally recommend revocation, suspension, or 
967 modification of any Massachusetts AI Trust Certification or sandbox participation. A formal 
968 recommendation shall be made only by the affirmative vote of not fewer than two-thirds of the 
969 seated voting members, and in no event fewer than 6, with the vote and rationale documented in 
970 the public record. 
971  (2) The governing board of the Authority shall vote publicly on any revocation 
972 recommendation within 90 days of receipt. If the governing board declines to act on the 
973 recommendation, it shall publish its written reasoning. 
974  (3) Voluntary withdrawal from certification or sandbox participation during the pendency 
975 of a formal inquiry or revocation proceeding shall not moot the proceeding. The Authority shall 
976 proceed to a finding on whether revocation would have been appropriate and shall note any such 
977 voluntary withdrawal in the public registry. 
978  (k) Escalation to legislative oversight. If the Community Advisory Board, by the 
979 affirmative vote of not fewer than two-thirds of the seated voting members, and in no event 
980 fewer than 6, concludes that the Authority has systematically failed to fulfill its statutory mission 
981 or has unreasonably failed to respond to the Board's petitions or recommendations, the Board 

48 of 58 982 may refer the matter to the Joint Committee on Advanced Information Technology, the Internet 
983 and Cybersecurity under section 8(a)(5). 
984  (l) Limitation of authority. The Community Advisory Board shall have no regulatory 
985 authority, no permitting authority, and no authority to directly delay, condition, or restrict the 
986 deployment or use of any AI system. The authorities granted under this section are authorities of 
987 inquiry, petition, recommendation, and referral. Final action with respect to certification, 
988 sandbox admission, or reciprocity rests with the governing board of the Authority. The Board's 
989 jurisdiction extends to certified entities, sandbox participants, and applicants; it does not extend 
990 to the internal operations or personnel decisions of the Authority. 
991  (m) Rights of entities under inquiry. 
992  (1) An entity that is the subject of a formal inquiry has the right to notice of the inquiry, a 
993 statement of the matters under inquiry, and a reasonable opportunity to respond. 
994  (2) At the conclusion of an inquiry in which no violation is found, the Board's findings 
995 shall clearly state this result, and the entity shall have the right to a public statement in the 
996 Board's findings. 
997  (3) An entity subjected to a formal inquiry that a court finds to have been conducted 
998 without adequate factual basis may seek declaratory relief and recovery of reasonable legal costs. 
999 This remedy shall not be available for inquiries that identified partial violations, concerning 
1000 practices short of violations, or conduct warranting further review. 
1001  (n) Confidentiality and member conduct. 

49 of 58 1002  (1) Board members serve under a confidentiality obligation regarding non-public 
1003 information obtained through Board proceedings. Leaks or unauthorized disclosures of non-
1004 public information shall constitute grounds for removal under subsection (d)(6). 
1005  (2) Public statements by individual members about pending Board matters are prohibited. 
1006 Only the Board's formal published findings and actions speak for the Board. This paragraph does 
1007 not restrict individual members' First Amendment rights to speak about general AI policy matters 
1008 not directly before the Board. 
1009  (3) Board members shall not communicate with certified entities, sandbox participants, or 
1010 applicants about pending matters outside formal Board proceedings. Any such communications 
1011 shall be disclosed to the Board and, upon conclusion of the matter, to the public. 
1012  (4) Board members who declare candidacy for partisan elected office shall resign from 
1013 the Board immediately. The Board's prior work involving matters in which the former member 
1014 substantively participated shall be subject to retroactive review for potential conflicts. 
1015  (o) Meetings. Community Advisory Board meetings shall be open to the public and 
1016 subject to the open meeting law, sections 18 to 25, inclusive, of chapter 30A of the General 
1017 Laws. Meeting agendas, minutes, and materials shall be published on a public website not fewer 
1018 than 48 hours before each meeting and within 7 days following each meeting, respectively. The 
1019 Board may hold non-public executive sessions solely for the purpose of discussing specific 
1020 matters of ongoing inquiry that would be prejudiced by public discussion, consistent with the 
1021 executive session provisions of section 21 of said chapter 30A. 
1022  (p) Resources. 

50 of 58 1023  (1) The Community Advisory Board shall have dedicated professional staff support 
1024 within the Authority. The Authority shall provide the Board with not less than the equivalent of 5 
1025 full-time professional staff positions at commencement of Board operations, increasing as 
1026 caseload warrants, including legal, investigative, technical, and policy staff. Board staff shall 
1027 report to the Board with respect to the exercise of the Board's authorities under this section. 
1028  (2) Board members shall receive an annual stipend of not less than $15,000 in recognition 
1029 of the time commitment required, together with reimbursement for expenses reasonably incurred 
1030 in Board service. 
1031  (3) The Board shall have access to independent technical expertise through contract or 
1032 consulting arrangements, with such access not contingent on the approval of the Executive 
1033 Director of the Authority. 
1034  (4) The Board's annual operating budget shall be not less than 15 percent of the 
1035 Authority's annual operating budget, drawn from the Trust Fund. This floor shall not be 
1036 construed to limit the Board's ability to request or receive additional resources as warranted. 
1037  (5) Newly seated Board members shall receive substantive technical orientation, arranged 
1038 by the Authority in consultation with academic institutions or independent experts, during the 
1039 first 120 days of their term. 
1040  Section 11. The Relationship with the Massachusetts Municipal Association. 
1041  (a) Named consultation partner. The MMA is recognized as a named consultation partner 
1042 of the Authority when dealing with matters impacting municipalities. Before adopting or 
1043 amending any rule that impacts municipal involvement in the Community AI Understanding 

51 of 58 1044 Program, the Innovation Sandbox, reciprocity agreements or municipal access to AI Trust 
1045 Certification processes, the Authority shall seek input from or consult with the MMA. 
1046  (b) Partnership functions. The Authority has the right to engage the MMA through 
1047 contract or intergovernmental agreement to perform any of the following functions on behalf of 
1048 the Authority or to support any of the programs administered by the Authority: 
1049  (1) administration of municipally related peer learning networks, training for officials and 
1050 the development and publication of model municipal policies; 
1051  (2) technical assistance rendered to small towns defined as having populations under 
1052 25,000 in support of participation in the Community AI Understanding Program; 
1053  (3) incident reporting that shall aggregate said municipal AI incidents up to the Authority 
1054 and the Community Advisory Board; and 
1055  (4) support function for recruiting geographically and/or demographically diverse 
1056 municipalities for the Authority's obligation under section 6(f). 
1057  (c) Guaranteed representation. One non-voting seat will be held by the MMA on both the 
1058 Community Advisory Board and the Authority's governing board, as provided in sections 
1059 9(b)(1)(H) and 10(b), which shall be for the purpose of ensuring efficient and smooth cross-
1060 communication between the MMA and both of said bodies. 
1061  (d) Deemed compliance. Model municipal AI policies described in subsection (b)(1) of 
1062 this section, adopted by a municipality and written and published by the MMA without any 
1063 materially relevant changes, shall presumptively satisfy any baseline municipal requirements set 
1064 forth by the Authority, subject to review by the Community Advisory Board. 

52 of 58 1065  (e) Funding. The MMA shall be reimbursed by the Authority for performing the 
1066 functions described under subsection (b) through a budget line from the Authority and drawn 
1067 from the Trust Fund. The Authority and the MMA will together draft an agreement defining the 
1068 level of funding that shall be sufficient to support all the functions assigned to the MMA. 
1069  (f) Alternative partners. Functions under subsection (b) that the MMA declines to 
1070 perform, or where the Authority decides another partner is better equipped or suited to perform, 
1071 the Authority may choose to contract with the Collins Center for Public Management at the 
1072 University of Massachusetts Boston or any other qualified entity subjected to a competitive 
1073 process. 
1074  (g) Non-displacement. Nothing in this section shall be construed as a displacement, 
1075 restriction or otherwise a diminishment of the independent advocacy role of the MMA on behalf 
1076 of its municipal membership and with respect to this chapter or any other matter regardless of 
1077 nature. 
1078  Section 12. Intermunicipal Cooperation. 
1079  (a) In order to build shared infrastructure concerning transparency, for conducting joint 
1080 Community AI Assessments and for the pooling of resources relating to data governance and AI 
1081 oversight capacity, the municipalities of the commonwealth may voluntarily enter into 
1082 cooperative agreements. 
1083  (b) Data generated by or through a cooperation framework entered into under this section 
1084 shall be owned exclusively by the municipality within whose jurisdiction it was generated, and 
1085 that municipality shall retain primary authority over said data, which is affirmed by the General 
1086 Court. 

53 of 58 1087  (c) From the Trust Fund the Authority shall administer grants to support voluntary 
1088 municipal cooperation with priority to be given to small municipalities defined as municipalities 
1089 with populations under 25,000 and/or with limited technical capacity to be determined by the 
1090 Authority and the MMA. 
1091  Section 13. Massachusetts AI Trust Fund. 
1092  (a) Trust Fund. There shall be established and placed within the Authority a fund to be 
1093 known as the Massachusetts AI Trust Fund, to be held by the Authority separate and apart from 
1094 its other funds. The Fund shall be credited with: 
1095  (1) any appropriations, bond proceeds, federal grants, or other monies authorized to be 
1096 credited thereto by the General Court; 
1097  (2) fees established by the Authority by regulation for AI Trust Certification applications, 
1098 renewals, Innovation Sandbox participation, reciprocity processing, and related services; 
1099  (3) assessments established by the Authority under subsection (c); 
1100  (4) grants from foundations, federal agencies, and other non-state sources received for 
1101 purposes consistent with this chapter; and 
1102  (5) any other monies which may be available and are directed to the Fund. 
1103  (b) Expenditure. The Authority shall expend monies in the Fund for the purposes of this 
1104 chapter without further appropriation, including for operation of the Authority, the Community 
1105 Advisory Board, programs administered by the Authority, grants to municipalities under sections 
1106 6 and 12, reimbursement to the Massachusetts Municipal Association under section 11, and other 
1107 purposes consistent with this chapter. 

54 of 58 1108  (c) Industry assessment. 
1109  (1) The Authority may annually assess covered AI deployers and developers doing 
1110 business in the commonwealth, in such amounts and on such formula as the Authority shall 
1111 determine by regulation, to fund the operations of the Authority and its programs. 
1112  (2) The Authority shall establish by regulation the categories of deployers and developers 
1113 subject to assessment, reasonable thresholds for assessment based on Massachusetts-related AI 
1114 revenue or scale of AI deployment, and a formula designed to distribute the assessment burden 
1115 equitably across categories of regulated entities; provided that no entity with annual 
1116 Massachusetts-related AI revenue below $10,000,000 shall be subject to assessment, and 
1117 provided further that the categories initially subject to assessment shall be limited to certified 
1118 entities, sandbox participants, applicants for certification or sandbox admission, and vendors 
1119 under enterprise AI deployment contracts with the commonwealth. 
1120  (3) No assessment shall exceed the amount reasonably necessary to fund the Authority's 
1121 operations and programs, taking into account other available funding sources; the aggregate of 
1122 all assessments in any fiscal year shall not exceed the Authority's approved operating budget for 
1123 that year; and each assessment shall bear a reasonable relationship to the cost of the regulatory 
1124 and programmatic services provided by the Authority to the entities assessed, it being the intent 
1125 of the General Court that the assessment operate as a regulatory fee and not as a tax. 
1126  (4) The Authority shall publish the methodology by which each assessment is calculated 
1127 and shall provide by regulation an administrative process through which an assessed entity may 
1128 seek review of the calculation or applicability of an assessment, with further review available 
1129 under chapter 30A. 

55 of 58 1130  (d) Fee schedule. The Authority shall establish by regulation a fee schedule for AI Trust 
1131 Certification applications, renewals, Innovation Sandbox participation, and reciprocity 
1132 processing. The fee schedule shall be tiered by the size of the applying entity and the tier of 
1133 certification sought, and shall include reduced fees for startups, small businesses, and 
1134 organizations with limited capacity. Fees shall be reviewed not less than every 3 years and 
1135 adjusted as necessary to maintain proportionality to the cost of providing the relevant services. 
1136  (e) Audit. The Authority shall be subject to audit by the state auditor. The Authority shall 
1137 publish audited financial statements annually. 
1138  Section 14. Limitations. 
1139  (a) Except for the disclosure, recordkeeping, reporting, auditing, procurement, 
1140 certification, and facility impact reporting obligations expressly established by this chapter, 
1141 nothing in this chapter shall be construed to: 
1142  (1) prohibit, restrict, condition, license, or impose operational requirements upon the 
1143 development, training, deployment, or use of any artificial intelligence system; provided, 
1144 however, that the facility impact reporting authorized by section 4 concerns the physical 
1145 operation of covered facilities and does not constitute an operational requirement upon any AI 
1146 system within the meaning of this paragraph; 
1147  (2) create any regulatory authority, permitting requirement, or approval process for AI 
1148 systems at the state or municipal level; 
1149  (3) require the disclosure of proprietary algorithms, trade secrets, model weights, training 
1150 data, or other confidential intellectual property; the disclosure obligations of section 2 attach 

56 of 58 1151 solely to the application of the AI system, at inference, to the affected individual, and shall not be 
1152 construed to require any examination of or inquiry into training data, training methodology, or 
1153 model development processes; 
1154  (4) require the documentation, inventory, or auditing of training data used to develop 
1155 foundation models or large language models, the General Court having found that, as of the 
1156 effective date of this Act, such requirements are technically infeasible for these systems using 
1157 currently available methods and do not address the inference-time risks that are the subject of 
1158 this chapter; provided that nothing in this subsection limits the authority of existing law to 
1159 require training data documentation for narrow AI systems where such documentation is 
1160 feasible; and provided further that this subsection shall not be construed to limit the authority of 
1161 the General Court to revisit training data documentation requirements as methods and technical 
1162 standards evolve; 
1163  (5) impose liability based solely on the composition or provenance of training data for 
1164 foundation models or large language models, the General Court having determined that the 
1165 relevant transparency obligation for these systems attaches at the point of impact on individuals, 
1166 not at the point of model development; or 
1167  (6) limit the right of any person or entity to develop, train, deploy, or use computational 
1168 resources for lawful purposes; the visibility provided in section 4 is not a limitation of that right. 
1169  (b) This chapter establishes transparency at the point of impact. It requires that when AI 
1170 systems make or substantially inform consequential decisions about Massachusetts residents, 
1171 those residents can see it. It extends the same principle to delegated transactions in which AI 
1172 systems act autonomously on behalf of residents, and to the community impacts of the physical 

57 of 58 1173 infrastructure from which these systems operate. It does not dictate how AI systems are built, 
1174 what data they are trained on, or how they operate internally. The Commonwealth of 
1175 Massachusetts welcomes the development and deployment of artificial intelligence and seeks to 
1176 create conditions of trust and visibility in which innovation thrives. 
1177  (c) Nothing in the general laws shall be construed to diminish municipal AI transparency 
1178 authority as affirmed by sections 3 and 4 of this chapter except by express legislative statement 
1179 specifically and explicitly identifying its intent to restrict, diminish, or preempt such authority. 
1180  (d) Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to limit any right, remedy, or protection 
1181 available to any resident, worker, or municipality under any other provision of the general laws, 
1182 federal law, or municipal ordinance. 
1183  SECTION 4. Severability. 
1184  If any provision of this act or the application thereof to any person or circumstance is 
1185 held invalid, such invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications of this act which can 
1186 be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this 
1187 act are declared to be severable. 
1188  SECTION 5. Effective Date and Transition. 
1189  (a) This act shall take effect on January 1, 2028, except as otherwise provided in this 
1190 section. 
1191  (b) The Authority established under section 9 of the chapter inserted by section 4 of this 
1192 act may take such preparatory actions as necessary prior to the effective date, including 
1193 appointing an initial governing board, hiring initial staff, developing regulations, establishing AI 

58 of 58 1194 Trust Certification criteria, soliciting municipal participation in the Community AI 
1195 Understanding Program, convening the initial Community Advisory Board selection process, and 
1196 entering into initial consultation with the Massachusetts Municipal Association under section 11 
1197 of said chapter. 
1198  (c) The appointing authorities for the governing board of the Authority shall make initial 
1199 appointments not later than 180 days following the enactment of this act. The initial Community 
1200 Advisory Board selection process shall conclude not later than 360 days following the enactment 
1201 of this act. 
1202  (d) Prior to the seating of the members selected by the Community Advisory Board under 
1203 section 9(b)(1)(G) of said chapter, the governing board of the Authority may organize and 
1204 exercise all powers of the Authority with the seats then filled, and a majority of the seated voting 
1205 members shall constitute a quorum for that period. 
1206  (e) For the initial selection of the Community Advisory Board only, the municipal seats 
1207 under section 10(b)(1) of said chapter may be filled upon the nomination of the governing body 
1208 of any municipality that has, by vote of its governing body, committed to participate in the 
1209 Community AI Understanding Program. 
1210  (f) Regulations adopted by the Authority under said chapter shall be subject to the 
1211 provisions of chapter 30A of the general laws governing the adoption of regulations by state 
1212 agencies.